Washington statutes.
RCW 27.20.050

Duties of law librarian.

The duties of the state law librarian shall be as prescribed by statute and by rules of court.

[ 1959 c 188 s 3.]

NOTES:

Duties of state law librarian relative to session laws, legislative journals and supreme court reports: Chapter 40.04 RCW.